tests/чӗрӗп.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах чӗрӗп":
    чӗрӗп<n><nom> :  чӗрӗп 
    чӗрӗп<n><gen> :  чӗрӗпӗн 
    чӗрӗп<n><dat> :  чӗрӗпе 
    чӗрӗп<n><loc> :  чӗрӗпре 
    чӗрӗп<n><abl> :  чӗрӗпрен 
    чӗрӗп<n><ins> :  чӗрӗппе 
    чӗрӗп<n><abe> :  чӗрӗпсӗр 
    чӗрӗп<n><ben> :  чӗрӗпшӗн
    чӗрӗп<n><px1sg><nom> :  чӗрӗпӗм 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1sg><gen> :  чӗрӗпӗмӗн 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1sg><dat> :  чӗрӗпӗме 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1sg><loc> :  чӗрӗпӗмре 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1sg><abl> :  чӗрӗпӗмрен 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1sg><ins> :  чӗрӗпӗмпе 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1sg><abe> :  чӗрӗпӗмсӗр 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1sg><ben> :  чӗрӗпӗмшӗн
    чӗрӗп<n><px2sg><nom> :  чӗрӗпӳ 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2sg><gen> :  чӗрӗпӳн 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2sg><dat> :  чӗрӗпне 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2sg><loc> :  чӗрӗпӳнте 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2sg><abl> :  чӗрӗпӳнтен 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2sg><ins> :  чӗрӗпӳпе 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2sg><abe> :  чӗрӗпӳсӗр 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2sg><ben> :  чӗрӗпӳшӗн
    чӗрӗп<n><px3sp><nom> :  чӗрӗпӗ 
    чӗрӗп<n><px3sp><gen> :  чӗрӗпӗн 
    чӗрӗп<n><px3sp><dat> :  чӗрӗпне 
    чӗрӗп<n><px3sp><loc> :  чӗрӗпӗнче 
    чӗрӗп<n><px3sp><abl> :  чӗрӗпӗнчен 
    чӗрӗп<n><px3sp><ins> :  чӗрӗпӗпе 
    чӗрӗп<n><px3sp><abe> :  чӗрӗпӗсӗр 
    чӗрӗп<n><px3sp><ben> :  чӗрӗпӗшӗн
    чӗрӗп<n><px1pl><nom> :  чӗрӗпӗмӗр 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1pl><gen> :  чӗрӗпӗмӗрӗн 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1pl><dat> :  чӗрӗпӗмӗре 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1pl><loc> :  чӗрӗпӗмӗрте 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1pl><abl> :  чӗрӗпӗмӗртен 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1pl><ins> :  чӗрӗпӗмӗрпе 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1pl><abe> :  чӗрӗпӗмӗрсӗр 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1pl><ben> :  чӗрӗпӗмӗршӗн
    чӗрӗп<n><px2pl><nom> :  чӗрӗпӗр 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2pl><gen> :  чӗрӗпӗрӗн 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2pl><dat> :  чӗрӗпӗре 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2pl><loc> :  чӗрӗпӗрте 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2pl><abl> :  чӗрӗпӗртен 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2pl><ins> :  чӗрӗпӗрпе 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2pl><abe> :  чӗрӗпӗрсӗр 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2pl><ben> :  чӗрӗпӗршӗн
    чӗрӗп<n><pl><nom> :  чӗрӗпсем 
    чӗрӗп<n><pl><gen> :  чӗрӗпсен 
    чӗрӗп<n><pl><dat> :  чӗрӗпсене 
    чӗрӗп<n><pl><loc> :  чӗрӗпсенче 
    чӗрӗп<n><pl><abl> :  чӗрӗпсенчен 
    чӗрӗп<n><pl><ins> :  чӗрӗпсемпе 
    чӗрӗп<n><pl><abe> :  чӗрӗпсемсӗр 
    чӗрӗп<n><pl><ben> :  чӗрӗпсемшӗн
    чӗрӗп<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  чӗрӗпӗмсем 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  чӗрӗпӗмсен 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  чӗрӗпӗмсене 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  чӗрӗпӗмсенче 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  чӗрӗпӗмсенчен 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  чӗрӗпӗмсемпе 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  чӗрӗпӗмсемсӗр 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  чӗрӗпӗмсемшӗн
    чӗрӗп<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  чӗрӗпӳсем 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  чӗрӗпӳсен 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  чӗрӗпӳсене 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  чӗрӗпӳсенче 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  чӗрӗпӳсенчен 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  чӗрӗпӳсемпе 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  чӗрӗпӳсемсӗр 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  чӗрӗпӳсемшӗн
    чӗрӗп<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  чӗрӗпӗсем 
    чӗрӗп<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  чӗрӗпӗсен 
    чӗрӗп<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  чӗрӗпӗсене 
    чӗрӗп<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  чӗрӗпӗсенче 
    чӗрӗп<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  чӗрӗпӗсенчен 
    чӗрӗп<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  чӗрӗпӗсемпе 
    чӗрӗп<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  чӗрӗпӗсемсӗр 
    чӗрӗп<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  чӗрӗпӗсемшӗн
    чӗрӗп<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  чӗрӗпӗмӗрсем 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  чӗрӗпӗмӗрсен 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  чӗрӗпӗмӗрсене 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  чӗрӗпӗмӗрсенче 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  чӗрӗпӗмӗрсенчен 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  чӗрӗпӗмӗрсемпе 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  чӗрӗпӗмӗрсемсӗр 
    чӗрӗп<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  чӗрӗпӗмӗрсемшӗн
    чӗрӗп<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  чӗрӗпӗрсем 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  чӗрӗпӗрсен 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  чӗрӗпӗрсене 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  чӗрӗпӗрсенче 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  чӗрӗпӗрсенчен 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  чӗрӗпӗрсемпе 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  чӗрӗпӗрсемсӗр 
    чӗрӗп<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  чӗрӗпӗрсемшӗн
